src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h32_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    høvd+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: høvd
    høvd+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: høvd
    høvd+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: høvdi
    høvd+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: høvuðs
    høvd+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: høvd
    høvd+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: høvd
    høvd+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: høvdum
    høvd+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: høvda
    høvd+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: høvdið
    høvd+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: høvdið
    høvd+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: høvdinum
    høvd+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: høvuðsins
    høvd+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: høvdini
    høvd+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: høvdini
    høvd+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: høvdunum
    høvd+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: høvdanna
